Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1260YC (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 39.2, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. Except as provided in paragraph âdâ , for a school 3 district or merged area, in the odd-numbered year, the first 4 Tuesday in March, the second Tuesday in September, or the 5 first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. For a 6 school district or merged area, in the even-numbered year, the 7 first Tuesday in March, or the second Tuesday in September. 8 In addition, for a school district or merged area, in the 9 even-numbered year, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in 10 November, if the special election is for the levying of a tax 11 pursuant to section 298.18 or the adjustment of a levy pursuant 12 to section 298.18A. 13